Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1709.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 15, Chapter 366, O.S.L.


2024 (21 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 20O), is amended to read as


follows:


Section 20O. A. Upon the effective date of this act On or


after January 1, 2026, Class D2 shall include the following criminal


offenses:


1. Attempt Attempting to escape from a penitentiary, as


provided for in Section 434 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes


this title;



Req. No. 3195 Page 1


2. Attempt Attempting to escape from prison, not a


penitentiary, as provided for in Section 436 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes this title;


3. Escape from arrest or detention for a felony, as provided


for in subsection C of Section 444 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma


Statutes this title;


4. Aggravated assault and battery upon medical care provider,


as provided for in Section 650.5 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma


Statutes this title;


5. Omitting to provide for a child, as provided for in Section


852 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


6. Harboring an endangered runaway child, second or subsequent


offense, as provided for in Section 856.2 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes this title;


7. Discharging a stun gun, tear gas, mace, or other agent


against officer, as provided for in Section 1272.3 of Title 21 of


the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


8. Possession of sawed-off shotgun, as provided for in Section


1289.18 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


9. Transmit Transmitting threatening letter, as provided for in


Section 1304 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


10. Abortion


9. Performing an abortion without a license, as provided for in


Section 1-731 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;

Req. No. 3195 Page 2


11. Abortion


10. Performing an abortion after the first trimester, as


provided for in Section 1-731 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


12. 11. Self-induced abortion, as provided for in Section 1-733


of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


13. Violate


12. Violation of the Oklahoma Unborn Child Protection from


Dismemberment Abortion Act, as provided for in Section 1-737.9 of


Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


14. 13. Violation of the Unborn Child Pain Awareness/Prevention


Act, as provided for in Section 1-738.14 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


15. 14. Knowingly perform an abortion on an unemancipated


minor, as provided for in Section 1-740.4b of Title 63 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


16. 15. Make a fraudulent statement to obtain an abortion for a


minor, as provided for in Section 1-740.4b of Title 63 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


17. 16. Violation of the Pain-Capable Unborn Child Protection


Act, as provided for in Section 1-745.7 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


18. 17. Violation of the Heartbeat Informed Consent Act, as


provided for in Section 1-746.7 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;

Req. No. 3195 Page 3


19. 18. Abortion on a minor less than fourteen (14) years of


age or failure to submit tissue, as provided for in Section 1-749 of


Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


20. 19. Distribution of imitation controlled substance, second


offense, as provided for in Section 2-401 of Title 63 of the


Oklahoma Statutes; and


21. Assist


20. Assisting another in the purchase of pseudoephedrine


products, second or subsequent offense, as provided for in Section


2-701 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


B. Any person convicted of a Class D2 criminal offense set


forth in this section shall be punished by imprisonment in the


custody of the Department of Corrections for a term of not more than


two (2) years and shall serve at least twenty percent (20%) of the


sentence imposed before release from custody.


C. 1. Every person who, having been previously convicted of


one or two Class C or Class D criminal offenses, commits a Class D2


criminal offense shall, upon conviction, be punished by imprisonment


in the custody of the Department of Corrections for a term of not


less than one (1) year nor more than five (5) years and shall serve


at least twenty percent (20%) of the sentence imposed before release


from custody including release to electronic monitoring pursuant to


Section 510.9 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes.



Req. No. 3195 Page 4


2. Every person who, having been previously convicted of three


Class C or Class D criminal offenses, or one or more Class Y, Class


A, or Class B criminal offenses, commits a Class D2 criminal offense


shall, upon conviction, be punished by imprisonment in the custody


of the Department of Corrections for a term of not less than one (1)


year nor more than ten (10) years and shall serve at least thirty


percent (30%) of the sentence imposed before release from custody


including release to electronic monitoring pursuant to Section 510.9


of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


D. Unless specifically exempted pursuant to subsection E of


this section, Section 51.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes


shall not apply to Class D2 criminal offenses.


E. 1. The criminal offenses listed in paragraphs 7, 9, 10, 11,


12, 13, 14, 15, 16, 17, and 18, and 19 of subsection A of this


section shall be exempt from the penalty provisions provided for in


subsections B and C of this section. Persons convicted of the


criminal offenses provided for in paragraphs 7, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13,


14, 15, 16, 17, and 18, and 19 of subsection A of this section shall


be punished in accordance with the corresponding penalties provided


for in the Oklahoma Statutes including Section 51.1 of Title 21 of


the Oklahoma Statutes.


2. The criminal offense listed in paragraphs 2, 4, 5, and 6 of


subsection A of this section shall be exempt from the penalty


provisions provided for subsection B of this section. Persons

Req. No. 3195 Page 5


convicted of the criminal offenses provided for in paragraphs 2, 4,


5, and 6 of subsection A of this section shall be punished in


accordance with the corresponding penalties provided for in the


Oklahoma Statutes including Section 51.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma


Statutes. The provisions of subsection C of this section still


applies to the criminal offenses listed in paragraphs 2, 4, 5, and 6


of subsection A of this section.


F. All Class D2 criminal offenses shall be punishable by the


corresponding fines as provided for in the Oklahoma Statutes.


SECTION 2. REPEALER 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1289.18, as


amended by Section 598, Chapter 486, O.S.L. 2025 (21 O.S. Supp.


2025, Section 1289.18), is hereby repealed.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3195 CN 1/14/2026 10:47:53 AM



















Req. No. 3195 Page 6